Tennessee, session 114, HB0990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-8-305, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(f) On or before January 1 of each year until the monument is complete, the
state capitol commission shall submit a report to the speaker of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives regarding any gifts, grants, or other donations
made toward the monument and the remaining funds needed for the monument.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0990
003086
- 1 -